Utah statutes.
48-2a-1006.   Indemnification of a general partner.

To the extent that a general partner has been successful on the merits or otherwise in defense of any action, suit, or proceeding brought against the general partner under Section 48-2a-1001, or in defense of any claim, issue, or matter therein, the general partner shall be indemnified by the limited partnership against expenses, including attorneys' fees, which the general partner actually and reasonably incurred.



Enacted by Chapter 233, 1990 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

